Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.100

Gambling revolving fund—Created—Receipts—Disbursements—Use.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

There is hereby created the gambling revolving fund which shall consist of all moneys receivable for licensing, penalties, forfeitures, and all other moneys, income, or revenue received by the commission. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. All moneys received by the commission or any employee thereof, except for change funds and an amount of petty cash as fixed by rule or regulation of the commission, shall be deposited each day in a depository approved by the state treasurer and transferred to the state treasurer to be credited to the gambling revolving fund. Disbursements from the revolving fund shall be on authorization of the commission or a duly authorized representative thereof. In order to maintain an effective expenditure and revenue control the gambling revolving fund shall be subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW but no appropriation shall be required to permit expenditures and payment of obligations from such fund. All expenses relative to commission business, including but not limited to salaries and expenses of the director and other commission employees shall be paid from the gambling revolving fund.

During the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the problem gambling treatment account, contingent on enactment of chapter ..., Laws of 2004 (*Second Substitute House Bill No. 2776, problem gambling treatment). Also during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the gambling revolving fund to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess nontribal fund balance of the fund. The commission shall not increase fees during the 2003-2005 fiscal biennium for the purpose of restoring the excess fund balance transferred under this section.

[ 2004 c 276 s 903; 2002 c 371 s 901; 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 917; 1985 c 405 s 505; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 10.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Second Substitute House Bill No. 2776 was not enacted during the 2004 legislative session.

Severability—Effective date—2004 c 276: See notes following RCW 43.330.167.

Severability—2002 c 371: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2002 c 371 s 926.]

Effective date—2002 c 371: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 5, 2002]." [ 2002 c 371 s 927.]

Severability—1991 sp.s. c 16: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 926.]

Effective date—1991 sp.s. c 16: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1991 except for section 916, which shall take effect immediately." [ 1991 sp.s. c 16 s 927.]

Severability—1985 c 405: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 405 s 510.]